


Friends Provident International












































Skip to content
Log out
Skip to Menu



Log out







































































Private Loans & Investments: Raising Money from Family and Friends | Nolo.com
















Grow Your Legal Practice
Meet the Editors
Sign In
Support








Search



Search Type

All
Products
Lawyers
Articles





Search Term



Location










Legal Topics
Small Business 
Business Financing, Loans & Capital










Private Loans & Investments: Raising Money from Family and Friends




Learn the basics of raising small business capital from family andfriends.






Share on Google Plus





Share on Facebook













 





Money from relatives and friends can supplement the business financing you're receiving from other sources -- or even fill a critical gap in starting up your business. Getting friends and family involved in business financing is not uncommon --  nearly one in ten Americans reports a loan outstanding to a relative or friend. This is not surprising, as both you and your family member or friend can stand to benefit from the deal.
Here's what you need to know before you launch into a sales pitch: the basics of private financing, how to present your proposal, and steps to formalize the deal. (To learn about the different options for raising money from family and friends, read Nolo's article  Raising Private Money: Gifts, Loans, and Equity Investments.)
Making it Work for Everyone
Raising money from family or friends may seem straightforward: they do something nice for you, and you owe money to somebody who is understanding. However, getting private money has even more advantages for both sides  -- though certainly you should tread lightly when making your personal relationships financial.
Advantages for You, the Business Owner
Raising money from family and friends has a number of advantages, especially as compared to other financing alternatives.

Private money may be available when other money is not.  If you've already maxed out your personal sources of cash, but don't have the collateral or revenue to attract bank or professional equity financing, the advantage of private money is obvious: It's your best, and sometimes only, source of start-up capital.
Private loans may be cheaper than other sources.  Family and friends, unlike banks, credit card companies, or even microlenders, are typically not out to make money off the deal. You could end up paying zero interest or interest at below the market rate.
Private loans offer flexibility.  Loans from banks and other institutions are nearly always standardized, but private lending is flexible: You can both set up a customized repayment plan (for example, a six-month grace period followed by 12 months of interest-only payments, followed by a graduated payment schedule for 36 months) and adjust your repayment schedule if your business hits a bump.
Private money represents validation from key supporters.  The start-up phase of a new business is a very stressful time, and having someone you know express his or her belief in you and your idea by writing a check can mean a lot.
Private money requires less work than other sources of equity capital.  You don't have to sell yourself nearly as hard to people who already know and trust you, and this can serve as a dry run for later attempts to secure professional equity financing.

Advantages for Your Lender
You needn't see yourself as preying on the charitable instincts of your family and friends. They also benefit in several ways from investing in your business.

Investing in you can satisfy your investor's altruistic motives.  Those closest to you might help finance your business because they have an unselfish desire to support you and want to see you succeed.
Investing in you can satisfy your investor's self-interest.  Your investor can make money from investing in you -- often, more than they might get from a comparable investment in a savings account or CD. Alternately, they might enjoy the thrill of getting involved with a successful business.

Special Considerations When Mixing Money and Relationships
Of course, there are potential pitfalls and hassles that come with mixing money and relationships. Family members may feel that you "owe them one." Or, you may not like having some lenders or investors watching your every move, then criticizing your new car or family vacation. And, not every lender will be sympathetic as you try to explain your need to reschedule or skip a payment.
For the most part, these are issues that can and should be dealt with in advance. Make the arrangement as professional as possible. That way, your private lender or investor will treat this as business, not a personal arrangement. You can, for example, offer collateral to secure your friend or family member's loan. And, you should agree on clear and definite terms for any loan, including payment dates, interest rate, and penalties, if any. If your friends or family make equity investments, you might agree to give them a right to share the proceeds from the business's assets if it's sold.
How to Ask Friends and Family for Financial Support
The biggest hurdle preventing many entrepreneurs from getting private financing is simply the fear of asking. You can overcome this fear with a combination of careful preparation and choosing a time and place that makes you and your prospective lender or investor comfortable.
Before actually asking for the loan or investment, plan out how you'll approach your friend or family member.

Decide when and where to discuss the proposition.  Decide whether it's better to bring your request up in a casual conversation or at an informal meeting. In either case, you should choose a setting that's suited to your relationship -- for a very close relationship, it might be in the potential lender's home at a time you regularly visit them, whereas a restaurant or café is a good location for meeting someone with whom you're not especially close.
Plan what to bring.  Think about what you can bring along to illustrate your plans, such as a brochure, sample product, or company logo, but remember that this is an informal situation where detailed plans and promissory notes would be out of place.

To actually make a compelling pitch, start by getting your potential investor excited about your business idea. Then, ease into your request when it seems to arise naturally. If the conversation goes well, wrap up by explaining that you'll shortly be sending a copy of your business plan and a request letter; don't try to formalize the loan or investment right then and there. If the conversation doesn't go well, give them time to review your request and maybe your business plan, then follow up to determine what your prospect needs to get to yes.
Document the Loan or Investment
Once someone has agreed to participate in financing your business, it's crucial to get the agreement in writing. In the case of a loan, you and your lender would draw up a promissory note detailing the amount you'll owe, your repayment schedule, and penalties if you fail to make a payment. In the case of an equity investment (which assumes that you've set up a corporation or LLC), you would negotiate a stock purchase agreement that includes your disclosures about the business and a description of the investor's ownership rights.




Share on Google Plus





Share on Facebook











Talk to a Lawyer



Need help? Start here.



Practice Area

Please select...Airplane Business TransactionsAsbestosAsylumAuto AccidentAviationAviation AccidentsBankruptcyBusinessChild CustodyChild SupportCivil RightsCollaborative DivorceCommercial Real EstateConsumer ProtectionCriminal DefenseDUI and DWIDebt SettlementDeportationDisabilityDivorceDivorce MediationEmploymentEnvironmentEstate PlanningExpungementFamilyForeclosureGreen CardImmigration LawIntellectual PropertyLandlord and TenantLegal MalpracticeLitigationLong Term DisabilityMaritimeMedical MalpracticeMilitary DivorceNursing Home or Elder AbuseOvertime PayPatentsPersonal InjuryProbateProduct LiabilityReal EstateSSDISecuritiesSex CrimesSexual HarassmentSocial Security DisabilityTaxTraffic TicketsTrucking AccidentUS CitizenshipUS VisaUnemploymentVeterans DisabilityWorkers CompensationWrongful DeathWrongful Termination



Zip Code








SEARCH




How it Works

Briefly tell us about your case
Provide your contact information
Choose attorneys to contact you











            Legal Information & Products from Nolo
        



Business Formation
Choosing a Business Structure
LLCs
Partnerships
Sole Proprietorships
Forming a Corporation


Popular Products from Nolo


Form an LLC



LLC or Corporation?



Guide to Single-Member LLCs
















        Related Products
      
MORE





Form Your Own Limited Liability Company



LLC or Corporation?



Nolo's Guide to Single-Member LLCs



Nolo's Quick LLC











FEATURED LISTINGS FROM NOLO


Swipe to view more








            Related Ads
        























NEED PROFESSIONAL HELP ?
Talk to a Business Law attorney.



Zip Code







Start



How It Works

Briefly tell us about your case
Provide your contact information
Choose attorneys to contact you












Copyright © 2017 Nolo ®  Self-help services may not be permitted in all states. The information provided on this site is not legal advice, does not constitute a lawyer referral service, and no attorney-client or confidential relationship is or will be formed by use of the site. The attorney listings on this site are paid attorney advertising. In some states, the information on this website may be considered a lawyer referral service. Please reference the Terms of Use and the Supplemental Terms for specific information related to your state. Your use of this website constitutes acceptance of the Terms of Use, Supplemental Terms, Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.


 



































SEC Info - Friends Investment Co Inc. - ‘SC 13G’ on 2/13/07 re: Euroseas Ltd.










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Friends Investment Co Inc. – ‘SC 13G’ on 2/13/07 re: Euroseas Ltd.On:  Tuesday, 2/13/07, at 9:03pm ET   ·   As of:  2/14/07   ·   Accession #:  919574-7-1033   ·   File #:  5-82592
Previous ‘SC 13G’:  None   ·   Next & Latest:  ‘SC 13G’ on 2/4/08



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

 2/14/07  Friends Investment Co Inc.        SC 13G                 1:10K  Euroseas Ltd.                     Seward & Kissel LLPF-->Statement of Beneficial Ownership   —   Schedule 13GFiling Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: SC 13G      Statement of Beneficial Ownership                      4     20K 

D-->Document Table of Contents
Page (sequential) | (alphabetic) Top A-->
Alternative Formats (Word, et al.)
Certification
Identification and Classification of Members of the Group
Identification and Classification of the Subsidiary Which Acquired the Security Being Reported on by the Parent Holding Company or Control Person
If This Statement is filed pursuant to ss.240.13d-1(b) or 240.13d-2(b), or (c), check whether the person filing is a:
Name of Issuer:
Name, Principal Business Address, and Citizenship of Persons Filing:
Notice of Dissolution of Group
Ownership
Ownership of Five Percent or Less of a Class
Ownership of More Than Five Percent on Behalf of Another Person
S-->
11st Page   -   Filing Submission
3Item 1(a). Name of Issuer:
"Item 2(a). Name, Principal Business Address, and Citizenship of Persons Filing:
"Item 3. If This Statement is filed pursuant to ss.240.13d-1(b) or 240.13d-2(b), or (c), check whether the person filing is a:
"Item 4. Ownership
"Item 5. Ownership of Five Percent or Less of a Class
"Item 6. Ownership of More Than Five Percent on Behalf of Another Person
"Item 7. Identification and Classification of the Subsidiary Which Acquired the Security Being Reported on by the Parent Holding Company or Control Person
"Item 8. Identification and Classification of Members of the Group
"Item 9. Notice of Dissolution of Group
"Item 10. Certification
P-->SC 13G1st Page of 4TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 
           UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
SCHEDULE 13G

 Under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 (Amendment No. __)*

 Euroseas Ltd.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
(Name of Issuer)

Common Stock
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
(Title of Class of Securities)

 Y23592 20 0
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
(CUSIP Number)

 December 31, 2006
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 (Date of Event Which Requires Filing of this Statement)

Check the appropriate box to designate the rule pursuant to which this
Schedule is filed:                                                              

[_]  Rule 13d-1(b)                                          

[_]  Rule 13d-1(c)                                          

[x]  Rule 13d-1(d)                                          

----------                                                                      
*    The remainder of this cover page shall be filled out for a reporting       
   person's initial filing on this form with respect to the subject class of
   securities, and for any subsequent amendment containing information which
would alter the disclosures provided in a prior cover page.           

   The information required in the remainder of this cover page shall not be
deemed to be "filed" for the purpose of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange   
Act of 1934 ("Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section of  
the Act but shall be subject to all other provisions of the Act (however, see   
the Notes).                                                                     

P-->SC 13G2nd Page of 4TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd
CUSIP No. Y23592 20 0                                                           
-----------                                                 

1.   NAME OF REPORTING PERSONS                                                  
I.R.S. IDENTIFICATION NOS. OF ABOVE PERSONS (ENTITIES ONLY)           

Friends Investment Company Inc.                                       

2.   CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP (SEE INSTRUCTIONS)        
                                                                         (a) [_]
                                                                         (b) [X]

3.   SEC USE ONLY                                                               
4.   CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION                                       

Republic of the Marshall Islands                                      

NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH               
5.   SOLE VOTING POWER                                                          

9,918,056                                                             

6.   SHARED VOTING POWER                                                        

0                                                                     

7.   SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER                                                     

9,918,056                                                             

8.   SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER                                                   

0                                                                     

9.   AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON               

9,918,056                                                             

10.  CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (9) EXCLUDES                      
CERTAIN SHARES (SEE INSTRUCTIONS)                                     

                                                                             [_]

11.  PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW 9                            

78.6%                                                                 

12.  TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON (SEE INSTRUCTIONS)                                
CO                                                                    

P-->SC 13G3rd Page of 4TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 3rd
CUSIP No. Y23592 20 0                                                           
-----------                                                 

Item 1(a).  Name of Issuer:                                                     

Euroseas Ltd.                                           
            --------------------------------------------------------------------

(b).  Address of Issuer's Principal Executive Offices:              

Aethrion Center                                         
40 Ag. Konstantinou Street                              
151 24 Maroussi, Greece                                 
            --------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 2(a).  Name, Principal Business Address, and Citizenship of Persons Filing:

Friends Investment Company Inc.                         

Aethrion Center                                         
40 Ag. Konstantinou Street                              
151 24 Maroussi, Greece                                 
            --------------------------------------------------------------------

(d).  Title of Class of Securities:                                 

Common Stock                                            
            --------------------------------------------------------------------

(e).  CUSIP Number:                                                 

Y23592 20 0 
            --------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 3.     If This Statement is filed pursuant to ss.240.13d-1(b) or           
   240.13d-2(b), or (c), check whether the person filing is a:

(a)  [_]  Broker or dealer registered under Section 15 of the Act (15 
U.S.C. 78c).                                      

  (b)  [_]  Bank as defined in Section 3(a)(6) of the Act (15 U.S.C. 78c).

   (c)  [_]  Insurance company as defined in Section 3(a)(19) of the Act (15
U.S.C. 78c).                                      

   (d)  [_]  Investment company registered under Section 8 of the Investment
Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. 80a-8).            

(e)  [_]  An investment adviser in accordance with Section            
240.13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(E);                           

 (f)  [_]  An employee benefit plan or endowment fund in accordance with
Section 240.13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(F);                   

 (g)  [_]  A parent holding company or control person in accordance with
Section 240.13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(G);                   

   (h)  [_]  A savings association as defined in Section 3(b) of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C.1813);            

(i)  [_]  A church plan that is excluded from the definition of an    
         investment company under Section 3(c)(14) of the Investment
Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. 80a-3);            

(j)  [_]  Group, in accordance with s.240.13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(J).         

Item 4.   Ownership.                                                            

Provide the following information regarding the aggregate number and  
percentage of the class of securities of the issuer identified in Item 1.       

(a)  Amount beneficially owned:                                       

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 9,918,056                 
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

(b)  Percent of class:                                                

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 78.6%                     
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

(c)  Number of shares as to which the person has:                     

(i)  Sole power to vote or to direct the vote:              

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 9,918,056                 

(ii) Shared power to vote or to direct the vote:            

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 0                         

(iii) Sole power to dispose or to direct the disposition of:  

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 9,918,056                 

 (iv) Shared power to dispose or to direct the disposition of:

Friends Investment Company Inc. - 0                         

Item 5.   Ownership of Five Percent or Less of a Class.                         

 If this statement is being filed to report the fact that as of the date
hereof the reporting person has ceased to be the beneficial owner of more than  
five percent of the class of securities, check the following [ ].               

          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 6.   Ownership of More Than Five Percent on Behalf of Another Person.      

   If any other person is known to have the right to receive or the power to
direct the receipt of dividends from, or the proceeds from the sale of, such    
securities, a statement to that effect should be included in response to this   
item and, if such interest relates to more than five percent of the class, such 
person should be identified. A listing of the shareholders of an investment     
company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 or the beneficiaries
of employee benefit plan, pension fund or endowment fund is not required.       

N/A                                                         
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 7.   Identification and Classification of the Subsidiary Which Acquired the
       Security Being Reported on by the Parent Holding Company or Control
Person.                                                     

If a parent holding company or Control person has filed this schedule,
pursuant to Rule 13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(G), so indicate under Item 3(g) and attach an  
exhibit stating the identity and the Item 3 classification of the relevant      
subsidiary. If a parent holding company or control person has filed this        
schedule pursuant to Rule 13d-1(c) or Rule 13d-1(d), attach an exhibit stating  
the identification of the relevant subsidiary.                                  

N/A                                                         
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 8.   Identification  and  Classification  of Members of the Group.         

   If a group has filed this schedule pursuant to ss.240.13d-1(b)(1)(ii)(J),
so indicate under Item 3(j) and attach an exhibit stating the identity and Item 
3 classification of each member of the group. If a group has filed this schedule
pursuant to ss.240.13d-1(c) or ss.240.13d-1(d), attach an exhibit stating the   
identity of each member of the group.                                           

N/A                                                         
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 9.   Notice of Dissolution of Group.                                       

     Notice of dissolution of a group may be furnished as an exhibit stating the
date of the dissolution and that all further filings with respect to            
transactions in the security reported on will be filed, if required, by members 
of the group, in their individual capacity. See Item 5.                         

N/A                                                         
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

Item 10.  Certification.
N/A                                                         
          ----------------------------------------------------------------------

P-->SC 13GLast Page of 4TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 4th
After reasonable inquiry and to the best of my knowledge and belief, I
certify that the information set forth in this statement is true, complete and  
correct.                                                                        

Friends Investment Company Inc.                                                 

By: /s/ Aristides J. Pittas                                                     
---------------------------                                                     
Name:  Aristides J. Pittas                                                      
Title: President                                                                

February 14, 2007
SK 02558 0004 746894                                                            
R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
Referenced-On PageThis ‘SC 13G’ Filing    Date First  Last      Other FilingsFiled as of:2/14/074Filed on:2/13/0712/31/06120-F List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0000919574-07-001033   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Fri, 28 Jul 21:23:25.0 GMT 



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









What deal structure should be in place for a friend/family investment of < 20k in your startup? - QuoraThis page may be out of date. Save your draft before refreshing this page.Submit any pending changes before refreshing this page. Hide this message.QuoraSign In Friends and Family Financing Startup Equity Startup Compensation Startup Funding Advice Investing Startup Advice and StrategyWhat deal structure should be in place for a friend/family investment of < 20k in your startup?A structure that will put the startup in a good position heading into a Series A round as well as reward family/friends generously for the risk they've chosen to take on.  Any links to relevant information would be fantastic!UpdateCancelPromoted by ToptalHire fundraising experts to prepare for your next round.Toptal matches top startups with experts in fundraising, financial modeling, forecasting, and more.Start Now at toptal.comAnswer Wiki5 Answers  Raad Ahmed, Founder of LawTrades; 500 Startups Batch 15; UB Law '13Updated 33w agoThe most important thing for you to do before anything else is to ensure full disclosure and adequate understanding of any terms and conditions with the proper documentation. This means having a business plan to share with your family and friend investors, as well as adequate legal protection - whether you’re using an investment vehicle or a simple unsecured loan.Encouraging an investment structure is going to look different than a simple loan. Convertible debt notes would generally be inappropriate for smaller investments. Instead, I would urge you to consider taking a look at convertible equity as an alternative to traditional convertible debt notes. Convertible equity vehicles - such as Ressi instruments, Y Combinator’s SAFE agreements, or KISS securities - simplify these transactions, reduce legal costs and enhance the opportunity for the company’s success.You can read more about how convertible equity works in another piece I recently wrote. For an investment of < 20k, however, I wouldn’t recommend convertible debt notes since the costs would likely outweigh the benefits of this type of structure. Typically, smaller investments from friends and family are unsecured loans (i.e., there’s no collateral to secure the loan’s repayment). Again, take a look at the convertible equity documents I listed above since they could be more attractive to smaller investors and expand your funding opportunities.The necessity to clarify the expectations of your family and friend investors prior to accepting funding can’t be overemphasized. Since F/F investors usually don’t demand sophisticated deal structures, you might be expected only to repay the loan. On the other hand, some might expect higher returns, so you should give considerable thought to developing some common key elements. Critical terms might include defining the equity type (e.g., common stock), board seats (e.g., offering seats to leading angels), price (ownership percentage), mechanisms for minimizing dilution, and dissolution preference.In order to best protect your company and interests, as well as personal relationships, it’s highly recommended that you obtain legal guidance, which can save you substantial money and hard feelings down the road. There is no one-size-fits-all in these situations, so engaging an attorney is actually an investment in your company.I invite you to check out LawTrades for additional information that can help you make these important decisions about structuring deals for early investments from friends and family. Also please feel free to message me directly if you want an entrepreneurs perspective on raising a seed round from your F&F investors. Hope this is helpful!3.7k Views · 12 UpvotesPromoted by CodementorXHow do I hire top developers on a startup budget?Hire top freelance developers on CodementorX. Starting from $60/hr!Start Now at hire.codementor.ioRelated QuestionsMore Answers BelowWhat is the best structure for a "Friends & Family" equity round for startup financing (US$150K)?I am thinking about starting a business and need to raise capital, most likely from family and friends. What is a smart way to structure these...How can I ask friends and family to invest in my startup without sounding crazy?Should a startup issue common stock to friends and family?Can friends and family invest in my startup from their 401k?  Gil Silberman, Advised hundreds & started a few myselfAnswered 309w ago · Upvoted by  David S. Rose, Managing Principal of Rose Tech Ventures. Active angel investor, CEO of Gust, Founder of New York A…Small pre-founding / pre-incorporation investments from friends and relations are typically handled as uncollateralized (and by default, subordinated and zero interest with no fixed payment schedule) personal loans to you or the company, or purchases of common stock.  A convertible note is a more formal way to do it, and (in a sense - see below) potentially more remunerative to your F&F investors. The downsides of convertible notes:Your legal paperwork has to be in order, and the starting point for doing that right is $5K.  That's a minor plus because if you go forward you'll have to do the paperwork sooner or later anyway, and it's smoother and less expensive to do it in the beginning.  But on balance paying for routine legal work is not always the best use of your highest risk early money.  Better spend it building product.Your F&F isn't likely to negotiate the terms or review the documents as closely as an arm's length angel investor.  Larger angel investors down the road may want different terms, which could require you to redraft or tear up the original note.When you get equity financing from VC or other sophisticated investors and convert all the note-holders to preferred stock, those later investors may not want to share the round and its attendant privileges with unsophisticated investors who are closely allied with the founders.If your F&F are investing primarily because they want to see you succeed, giving them a convertible note leading to stock in a startup doesn't really align with their interests.  They're investing in you, not your company.  Sure they may make a few dollars or even a large sum in a liquidity event 4-10 years from now, but most likely they will lose it all.Even if your company does not pay out, it will be a good experience for you and prepare you for your next startup, or wherever life takes you.  In that sense, their investment has succeeded.  But if your company fails you'll probably feel guilt and responsibility, that you owe it to your F&F to make them whole.  Many families break down after a family member spends the family wealth running a business into the ground, and feel that they deserve to be paid back.  A personal loan captures this real world expectation better than a purchase of stock in the company.By contrast, if your business does well and you're a good and generous person, you'll want to personally reward those who helped you succeed, even if it's not in the paperwork.  Within families people often put some of the family business into a trust, buy the parents a retirement home or vacation, set up a family charity, and so on.  You can pay it forward by giving the younger family members internships or investing in their own businesses or education.  That's all very hard to document in company paperwork via a formal investment scheme.  But informally, as it becomes clear that your company has a good prospect for success, you can ask your lawyer, accountant, or financial advisor about setting aside some of your founders stock (preferably non-voting common) for them.Most F&F loans aren't properly documented, so at least use a good loan form.  One caveat, if your relatives are sophisticated investors or want to be, that argues in favor of treating it as an arm's length investment.  It will help your company resume, and theirs as investors, if they are early participants / advisors / mentors for another successful startup.9.3k Views · 21 UpvotesPromoted by ShopifyCreate an online store website.Quick & easy setup - everything you need to start selling online today. Start a 14 day free trial now.Free Trial at shopify.com/free-trialView More AnswersRelated QuestionsI presented my startup idea to a well connected millionaire and he wants in on the startup. How should I structure the equity deal?My brother wants to invest $20k to start my tech startup. He won't do any work and I won't bring much money to start. How much equity do I nee...Where can I find a place to invest my money in startup companies? I have a lot of money.I own a business at the age of 19. How do I deal with the loss of friends and family?What's the best way to identify people in my network who might want to invest in a friends and family round for my startup?What is the best way to structure a $1MM friends/family fund for angel investments?Investment Advice: What is the best way to maximize profit using my 20K?How should I deal with a friend that is trying to steal my startup idea?Startup Advice and Strategy: My family wants to invest in my startup USD 200k. Should I take it or talk to "professional" investors?A friend will be investing $5000 into my startup as an pre-seed investment. How much equity should we give away?Related QuestionsWhat is the best structure for a "Friends & Family" equity round for startup financing (US$150K)?I am thinking about starting a business and need to raise capital, most likely from family and friends. What is a smart way to structure these...How can I ask friends and family to invest in my startup without sounding crazy?Should a startup issue common stock to friends and family?Can friends and family invest in my startup from their 401k?I presented my startup idea to a well connected millionaire and he wants in on the startup. How should I structure the equity deal?My brother wants to invest $20k to start my tech startup. He won't do any work and I won't bring much money to start. How much equity do I nee...Where can I find a place to invest my money in startup companies? I have a lot of money.I own a business at the age of 19. How do I deal with the loss of friends and family?What's the best way to identify people in my network who might want to invest in a friends and family round for my startup?Sitemap:#ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZAbout · Careers · Privacy · Terms · Contact

ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC. Credit report, products, contacts













 Florida






Search









    ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC.











Company number P04000074817
        

Status Inactive
        

FEI number 201120538
        

Company Type Domestic for Profit
        

Home State FL
        

Last activity date 3/16/2006
        

Date Of Incorporation 5/7/2004
        

Principal Address
            11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556
            


Mailing Address 11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556
        
ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC. Principals

Director
                Alderman Ronald
                 


Address
                11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556
                 



Director
                Nolder Debra
                 


Address
                1616 BURNING TREE LN., BRANDON, FL, 33510
                 







Last Annual Reports

2006 3/12/2006
            

2006 3/12/2006
            

2005 4/4/2005
            
Registered Agent

Agent Name ALDERMAN            RONALD (p)
        

Agent Address
                11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556
                

ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC. Events

1 VOLUNTARY           DISSOLUTION
            

filedDate 3/16/2006
            

Description
ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC. has been set up 5/7/2004 in state FL.  
The current status of the business is Inactive. The ALL FRIENDS INVESTMENTS INC. principal adress is 11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556. 
Meanwhile you can send your letters to 11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556. 
The company`s registered agent is ALDERMAN            RONALD 11519 BELMACK BLVD N, ODESSA, FL, 33556.  
The company`s management are Director - Alderman Ronald, Director - Nolder Debra. The last significant event in the company history is VOLUNTARY           DISSOLUTION which is dated by 3/16/2006. This decision is take in action on unknown.  The company annual reports filed on Annual reports – 3/12/2006.






Comprehensive Report about this company
        





(view sample)








Similar Companies
ALL FRIENDS, LLC
ALLFRIENDS MANAGEMENT, LLC
ALL FRIENDS PET SERVICES INC.
ALL FROM 1 INSURANCE SPECIALIST
ALL FROM HOME LLC
ALLFROMNATURE LLC











      Friends Investment Co Inc. 13D Filing - Insider Monkey                          Companies 0 See All     Hedge Funds 0 See All    Insiders 0 See All    Institutional Investors 0 See All   Click here to see all  results for  Sorry, no results has been found matching your query.                   Adblocker Detected    Dear Valued Visitor, We have noticed that you are using an ad blocker software.
    Although advertisements on the web pages may degrade your experience, our business certainly depends on them and we can only keep providing you high-quality research based articles as long as we can display ads on our pages. To view this article, you can disable your ad blocker and refresh this page or simply login. We only allow registered users to use ad blockers. You can sign up for free by clicking here or you can login if you are already a member.       Home > Insider Trading > Latest 13D and 13G Filings  > 13D Filing (0000919574-17-004579)    Filing Details     Accession Number: 0000919574-17-004579 Form Type: 13D Filing Publication Date: 2017-05-26 15:46:06     Filed By: Friends Investment Co Inc. Company:  Euroseas Ltd (NASDAQ:ESEA) Filing Date: 2017-05-26 SEC Url:  13D Filing     Ownership Summary   Please notice the below summary table is generated without human intervention and may contain errors. Please refer to the complete filing displayed below for exact figures.    Name Sole Voting Power Shared Voting Power Sole Dispositive Power Shared Dispositive Power Aggregate Amount Owned Power Percent of Class    Friends Investment Company Inc    3,452,358    0    3,452,358    0    3,452,358    31.7%   Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc    611,640    0    611,640     611,640    5.3%     Filing    UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549  SCHEDULE 13D Under The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Amendment No. 15)    Euroseas Ltd.   (Name of Issuer)     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   (Title of Class of Securities)     Y23592309   (CUSIP Number)     Friends Investment Company Inc. 4 Messogiou & Evropis St. 151 24 Maroussi Greece   (Name, Address and Telephone Number of Person Authorized to Receive Notices and Communications)     May 16, 2017   (Date of Event Which Requires Filing of this Statement)    If the filing person has previously filed a statement on Schedule 13G to report the acquisition which is the subject of this Schedule 13D, and is filing this schedule because of Rule 13d-1(e), Rule 13d-1(f) or Rule 13d-1(g), check the following box [X].     The information required on the remainder of this cover page shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purpose of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 ("Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section of the Act but shall be subject to all other provisions of the Act (however, see the Notes).        *The remainder of this cover page shall be filled out for a reporting person's initial filing on this form with respect to the subject class of securities, and for any subsequent amendment containing information which would alter disclosures provided in a prior cover page.      CUSIP No.   Y23592309        1.   NAME OF REPORTING PERSONS       I.R.S. IDENTIFICATION NOS. OF ABOVE PERSONS (ENTITIES ONLY)             Friends Investment Company Inc.      2.   CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP*       (a)   [_]       (b)   [_]    3.   SEC USE ONLY                  4.   SOURCE OF FUNDS*             WC      5.   CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEMS 2(d) OR 2(e)     [_]                6.   CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION             Republic of the Marshall Islands      NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH    7.   SOLE VOTING POWER             3,452,358      8.   SHARED VOTING POWER             0      9.   SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER           3,452,358      10.   SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER     [_]           0      11.   AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING       PERSON             3,452,358      12.   CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES       CERTAIN SHARES*         [    ]    13.   PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)             31.7%      14.   TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON*             CO       CUSIP No.   Y23592309        1.   NAME OF REPORTING PERSONS       I.R.S. IDENTIFICATION NOS. OF ABOVE PERSONS (ENTITIES ONLY)             Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc.      2.   CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP*       (a)   [_]       (b)  [_]   3.   SEC USE ONLY            4.   SOURCE OF FUNDS*             WC      5.   CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEMS 2(d) OR 2(e)     [_]                6.   CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION             Republic of the Marshall Islands      NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH    7.   SOLE VOTING POWER             611,640      8.   SHARED VOTING POWER             0      9.   SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER           611,640      10.   SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER     [_r]           0      11.   AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING       PERSON             611,640      12.   CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES       CERTAIN SHARES*         [    ]    13.   PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)             5.3%*      14.   TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON*             CO      *  As adjusted for authorized Common Shares not yet issued that are beneficially owned by Preferred Friends Investment Company.  CUSIP NO. Y23592309  This Schedule 13D is Amendment No. 15 with respect to Friends Investment Company Inc. and Amendment No. 6 with respect to Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc.  Item 1.  Security and Issuer  The class of equity security to which this statement relates is the Common Shares, $0.03 par value (the "Common Shares"), of Euroseas Ltd., a Marshall Islands corporation (the "Issuer").  The address of the principal executive office of the Issuer is 4 Messogiou & Evropis St., 151 24 Maroussi, Greece.  Item 2.  Identity and Background   (a),(f)  The persons filing this statement are Friends Investment Company Inc., a Marshall Islands corporation ("Friends Investment Company") and Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc., a Marshall Islands corporation ("Preferred Friends Investment Company" and together with Friends Investment Company, the "Reporting Persons").     (b)  The address of the principal place of business of Friends Investment Company and Preferred Friends Investment Company is 4 Messogiou & Evropis St., 151 24 Maroussi, Greece.     (b),(c)  The principal business of the Reporting Persons is acting as shipping investment holding companies.    The name, citizenship, present principal occupation or employment and business address of each executive officer and director of Friends Investment Company is set forth below.  If no business address is given, the director's or executive officer's address is 4 Messogiou & Evropis St., 151 24 Maroussi, Greece.                       Aristides P. Pittas       President, Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as Vice Chairman of the Issuer.                       Aristides J. Pittas       Vice President/Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as Chairman, CEO and President of the Issuer and President of Eurobulk Ltd.                       Nikolaos J. Pittas       Treasurer/Secretary/Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as the financial manager of Eurobulk Ltd.                       Emmanuel Pittas       Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as vice president of Eurobulk Ltd.   The name, citizenship, present principal occupation or employment and business address of each executive officer and director of Preferred Friends Investment Company is set forth below.  If no business address is given, the director's or executive officer's address is 4 Messogiou & Evropis St., 151 24 Maroussi, Greece.                       Aristides J. Pittas       President/Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as Chairman, CEO and President of the Issuer and President of Eurobulk Ltd.                       Nikolaos J. Pittas       Vice President/Director       Mr. Pittas is a citizen of Greece.  His principal occupation is serving as the financial manager of Eurobulk Ltd.                       Stephania J. Karmiri       Treasurer/Secretary/Director       Ms. Karmiri is a citizen of Greece.  Her principal occupation is serving as the corporate secretary and administration manager of Eurobulk Ltd..      (d),(e)  None of the Reporting Persons, nor any manager or executive officer of the Reporting Persons, has, during the past five years, (a) been convicted in a criminal proceeding (excluding traffic violations or similar misdemeanors) or (b) been a party to a civil proceeding of a judicial or administrative body of competent jurisdiction and as a result of such proceeding was or is subject to a judgment, decree or final order enjoining future violations of, or prohibiting, or mandating activities subject to, federal or state securities laws or finding any violation with respect to such laws.    Item 3.  Source and Amount of Funds or Other Consideration  The source of funds for the purchases of the 3,452,358 Common Shares directly owned by Friends Investment Company came from its working capital.  No borrowed funds were used to purchase the Common Shares, other than any borrowed funds used for working capital purposes in the ordinary course of business.  The source of funds for the purchase of the 611,640 Common Shares beneficially owned by Preferred Friends Investment Company pursuant to the "PIPE Transaction" (as described in Item 4 of the Schedule 13D/A filed with respect to the Issuer on August 18, 2014) came from its working capital.  No borrowed funds were used to purchase the Common Shares, other than any borrowed funds used for working capital purposes in the ordinary course of business.  The other persons named in response to Item 2 hold the following number of Common Shares in their accounts, which they received pursuant to the Issuer's Stock Incentive Plan and pursuant to certain rights offerings to shareholders of the Issuer:     Vested/Purchased Pursuant to a Rights Offering   Unvested   Aristides P. Pittas   445,000*   6,885   Aristides J. Pittas   0   25,245   Nikolaos J. Pittas   19,661   6,885   Emmanuel Pittas   34,363   6,885   *These shares are owned by a company of which Aristides P. Pittas and his immediate family are the sole owners.  Item 4.  Purpose of Transaction  The Reporting Persons have acquired their Common Shares of the Issuer for investment.  The Reporting Persons evaluate their investment in the Common Shares on a continual basis.  The Reporting Persons are filing this Schedule 13D/A to report a change in their beneficial ownership percentage of the Shares, as indicated in Item 5 below.  Aristides J. Pittas, who serves as the Vice President and as a Director of Friends Investment Company, and who also serves as the President as a Director of Preferred Friends Investment Company, is the Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer and a Class A Director of the Issuer.  Aristides P. Pittas, who serves as the President and as a Director of Friends Investment Company, is the Vice Chairman and a Class A Director of the Issuer.  On August 31, 2015, the Issuer announced that it was holding a rights offering (the "Rights Offering") in which shareholders of record as of August 14, 2015 were eligible to participate.  Pursuant to the terms of the Rights Offering, the Issuer distributed to eligible shareholders, at no extra charge, three non-transferable subscription rights for each four Common Shares owned by them on such date.  Each subscription right represented the right to purchase the Issuer's Common Shares at a subscription price of $4.50 per share and consisted of a basic subscription privilege and an oversubscription privilege.  The basic subscription privilege entitled holders of subscription rights to purchase one Common Share at the subscription price for each subscription right held.  The oversubscription privilege entitled holders of subscription rights who exercised their basic subscription privilege in full to purchase, at the subscription price, any Common Shares that the Issuer's other subscription rights holders did not purchase under their basic subscription privileges, subject to certain limitations.  Eligible shareholders were able to exercise their subscription rights until such rights expired at 5:00 p.m., Eastern Daylight Time, on September 17, 2015.  Friends Investment Company participated in the Rights Offering, resulting in its acquisition of 1,243,751 additional Common Shares.   Moreover, since certain persons serving as directors and officers for Preferred Friends Investment Company also serve in similar capacities for Friends Investment Company, Preferred Friends Investment Company and Friends Investment Company may be deemed to be affiliates of each other for purposes of reporting on Schedule 13D.  As such, each Reporting Person may be deemed to beneficially own the Common Shares of the other Reporting Person.  Except as set forth above, the Reporting Persons do not have any present plan or proposal which would relate to or result in any of the matters set forth in subparagraphs (a) - (j) of Item 4 of Schedule 13D.  The Reporting Persons intend to review their investment in the Issuer on a continuing basis.  Depending on various factors, the Reporting Persons may in the future take such actions with respect to their investment in the Issuer as they deem appropriate including, without limitation, purchasing additional Common Shares, selling some or all of their Common Shares, engaging in short selling of or any hedging or similar transaction with respect to the Common Shares or changing its intention with respect to any and all matters referred to in Item 4.   Item 5.  Interest in Securities of the Issuer     (a)-(d)  As of the date hereof, Friends Investment Company may be deemed to be the beneficial owner of 3,452,358 Common Shares, constituting 31.7% of the Common Shares, based upon 10,876,112 Common Shares outstanding.  Friends Investment Company has the sole power to vote or direct the vote of 3,452,358 Common Shares and the shared power to vote or direct the vote of 0 Common Shares.  Friends Investment Company has the sole power to dispose or direct the disposition of 3,452,358 Common Shares and the shared power to dispose or direct the disposition of 0 Common Shares.  The 3,452,358 Common Shares beneficially owned by Friends Investment Company were acquired in open market transactions.    As of the date hereof, Preferred Friends Investment Company may be deemed to be the beneficial owner of 611,640 Common Shares, constituting 5.3% of the Common Shares, based upon 11,487,752 Common Shares outstanding as adjusted for authorized Common Shares not yet issued that are beneficially owned by Preferred Friends Investment Company.  Preferred Friends Investment Company has the sole power to vote or direct the vote of 611,640 Common Shares and the shared power to vote or direct the vote of 0 Common Shares.  Preferred Friends Investment Company has the sole power to dispose or direct the disposition of 611,640 Common Shares and the shared power to dispose or direct the disposition of 0 Common Shares.  The 611,640 Common Shares beneficially owned by Preferred Friends Investment Company are beneficially owned pursuant to the PIPE Transaction (as further described in Item 4 of the Schedule 13D/A filed with respect to the Issuer on August 18, 2014), a privately negotiated transaction.  None of the other persons named in response to Item 2 have the sole power to vote or to direct the vote, the shared power to vote or direct the vote, the sole power to dispose or to direct the disposition of the Shares that are the subject of this Statement.  There have been no purchases or sales of the Common Shares during the past 60 days by Preferred Friends Investment Company.  The transactions by Friends Investment Company in the Common Shares during the past sixty days are set forth in Exhibit B.   (e)  N/A     Item 6.   Contracts, Arrangements, Understandings or Relationships with Respect to Securities of the Issuer  Except for the Securities Purchase Agreement and the Statement of Designation of the Rights, Preferences and Privileges of Series B Convertible Perpetual Preferred Shares of Euroseas Ltd., which are described in Item 4 of the Schedule 13D/A filed with respect to the Issuer on August 18, 2014 and attached as exhibits thereto, Preferred Friends Investment Company does not have any contract, arrangement, understanding or relationship with any person with respect to securities of the Issuer. Friends Investment Company does not have any contract, arrangement, understanding or relationship with any person with respect to the securities of the Issuer.  Item 7.  Material to be Filed as Exhibits  Exhibit A:  Joint Filing Agreement  Exhibit B:  Schedule of Transactions in Common Shares by Friends Investment Company SIGNATURES  After reasonable inquiry and to the best of my knowledge and belief, I certify that the information set forth in this statement is true, complete and correct.      May 26, 2017       (Date)           Friends Investment Company Inc.         By:  /s/ Aristides J. Pittas     Name: Aristides J. Pittas Title: Vice President       Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc.         By:  /s/ Aristides J. Pittas     Name: Aristides J. Pittas Title: President     Attention:  Intentional misstatements or omissions of fact constitute Federal criminal violations (see 18 U.S.C. 1001).  Exhibit A   AGREEMENT   The undersigned agree that this Amendment No. 15 to Schedule 13D, dated May 26, 2017, relating to the Common Shares, $0.03 par value, of Euroseas Ltd. shall be filed on behalf of the undersigned.      May 26, 2017       (Date)           Friends Investment Company Inc.         By:  /s/ Aristides J. Pittas     Name: Aristides J. Pittas Title: Vice President       Preferred Friends Investment Company Inc.         By:  /s/ Aristides J. Pittas     Name: Aristides J. Pittas Title: President                      Exhibit B  SCHEDULE OF TRANSACTIONS IN COMMON SHARES BY FRIENDS INVESTMENT COMPANY INC.  Schedule of Transactions in Common Shares by Friends Investment Company Inc.   Date of Transaction   Title of Class   Number of Common Shares Acquired   Number of Common Shares Disposed   Price Per Common Share    04/07/17   05/15/17   Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value   40,000   15,000   N/A   N/A   $1.32   $1.27     05/15/17   05/15/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     3,300   15,000     N/A   N/A     $1.25   $1.31     05/15/17   05/15/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     1,000   3,300     N/A   N/A     $1.25   $1.27     05/16/17   05/16/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     9,751   15,000     N/A   N/A     $1.30   $1.32     05/16/17   05/16/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     15,000   15,000     N/A   N/A     $1.30   $1.31     05/17/17   05/17/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     1,600   35,000     N/A   N/A     $1.29   $1.38     05/17/17   05/17/17     Common Shares, $0.03 par value   Common Shares, $0.03 par value     15,000   15,000     N/A   N/A     $1.35   $1.33     05/23/17         Common Shares, $0.03 par value         600         N/A         $1.25       SK 02558 0005 7501957           Hedge Fund Resource Center    How to Beat the Market by 20 Percentage Points Why Track Hedge Funds? Download a Free Edition! Why You Should DUMP Your Hedge Funds 6 Things You Didn't Know About Hedge Funds     Hot Topics     Apple (AAPL) Latest Stock News - Company Profile   Warren Buffett News & Analysis - Portfolio & Stock Picks   Biggest Insider Purchases & Sales News & Analysis - Data Screener   Google (GOOG) Latest Stock News - Company Profile   Microsoft (MSFT) Latest Stock News - Company Profile             Home Hedge Funds Markets Blog Authors About Us Contact Us Privacy Policy Terms of Use Site Map  All text and design is copyright ©2016 Koala Guide LLC. All rights reserved.             





Small Business Ideas and Resources for Entrepreneurs





































Startup 


Best Industries


Funding


Incubators


Business Plans


Naming


Home-Based Business


The UPS StoreView




Grow 


MB Vans


Strategy


Operations


Sales


Marketing


Customer Service


Franchises


Build




Lead 


Company Culture


Productivity


Public Speaking


Hiring


HR/Benefits


Women Entrepreneurs


Rising Stars


T-MobileView




Innovate 


Creativity


Invent


Design


Pivot




Technology 


Cloud Computing


Social Media


Security


Big Data




Money 


Bootstrapping


Crowdfunding


Venture Capital


Borrowing


Business Models


Personal Finance




Inc. 5000 


The 2016 US List


The 2017 Europe List


Apply Inc. 5000 US




Special Reports 


Notes to My Younger Self


Disruptive 25


Best Workplaces


Icons of Entrepreneurship


Best Industries


30 Under 30


Extreme Entrepreneurship


Main Street


World's Coolest Offices


College Startups


Founders 10


Design Awards




Video 


Tip Sheet


The Playbook


Founders Forum


Peak Performance


Women Who Lead


Notes to My Younger Self


World's Coolest Offices


How I Did It


Lift


Inc. Tested


Drinks With…


GrowCo 2017


Origin Stories


Inc. Live




Events 


Full Schedule


Inc. Women's Summit


Inc.5000 Conference & Gala


Iconic


GrowCo Conference




Inc. BrandView 

NEWSLETTERS 

MAGAZINE 

PARTNER CONTENT 


Inc. BrandView


Inc. Branded Content


Inc. Franchise




PODCASTS 

SUBSCRIBE 

ADVERTISE 

INC. RADIO 

INC. BUSINESS HUB 


Inc. Verified Profile


Inc. Plus


Send Press Releases


Plan for your business


Secure Funding


Get Published




OTHER EDITIONS 


Inc. ASEAN


Inc. Arabia




SITEMAP 

PRIVACY 

PRESS QUERIES 

AD CHOICE 

















 








			s.pageName = "";
		




















Friends and Family Investment















Why Family Members Should Never Be Your Go-To Source of Funding














Why You Should Treat Family and Friend Investors Like Any Other Shareholder



 










Steal This Plan for Building a Fan Community







WWE's Stephanie McMahon: How to Run a No-Drama Family Business







The Anti-Facebook: Inside the Journey to Build a More Secure Social Network








 
 












 






Sign Up for Today's 5 Must Reads







Follow inc.














More Stories

Popular
Latest




















Load More













 












 





Startup
Grow
Lead
Innovate
Technology
Money
Inc. 5000

Video




Events
Newsletters
Magazine
Inc. Radio
BrandView

Podcasts

Subscribe




Advertise
Privacy
Sitemap




SUBSCRIBE

Magazine
Digital Edition
FOLLOW INC.














                    COPYRIGHT 2017 MANSUETO VENTURES
                


 
 





















































 Contact us | Friends Provident International Rest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Go to Adviser site  Online Services  Login/RegisterOverseas life assurance businessChange payment detailsRest of the World region - Customer siteAre you a financial adviser?Open Adviser siteChoose your regionRest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Open navigationHome>Contact usKontakta ossHafðu sambandInternational Protector Africa contact usInternational Term Assurance contact usContact usHow to get in touch with usStandard articleStandard accordionOnline Services If you are having trouble logging on to our Online Services, please contact us using the details below.Hong KongCall us on +852 3550 6188Or you can email us: customerservicing@fpihk.com SingaporeCall us on +65 6320 7399Or you can email us:  singapore.enquiries@fpiom.com United Arab EmiratesCall us on +971 4436 2800Or you can email us: dubaiservicing@fpinternational.com   Rest of World Call us on: +44 1624 821212 and select option 4 from the menuOr you can e-mail us: onlineservices@fpiom.comGeneral Enquiries For general enquiries about your policy, please contact us using the details below. Call us on: +44 1624 821212 and select the correct option for your query from the menuOr you can e-mail us: rowservicing@fpiom.com   Friends Provident International Limited,Royal Court,Castletown,Isle of Man,British Isles,IM9 1RAOr please visit our customer websites for:    Hong Kong UAE Singapore UK Sweden GermanyIceland Latin AmericaComplaints If you wish to make a complaint about us please see our complaints guidePrintEmail Friends Provident International | United Kingdom United Kingdom Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Rest of World / IoM Germany Latin America Go to Adviser site  Online Services  Login/RegisterChange payment detailsUnited Kingdom region - Customer siteAre you a financial adviser?Open Adviser siteChoose your regionUnited Kingdom United Kingdom Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Rest of World / IoM Germany Latin America Open navigationEnter title :  On 19th July 2017 Aviva plc announced the sale of Friends Provident International Limited (“FPIL”) to RL360 Holding Company Limited (RL360), a subsidiary of International Financial Group Limited (IFGL). You can read details of the announcement here. Customers’ policies with FPIL are unaffected by this transaction; terms and conditions remain the same and customers and brokers should continue to contact FPIL as usual. FPIL remains focused on providing outstanding service to our customers.  home pageGo to Adviser siteProviding support for our existing customersThe UK offshore products, including Reserve Advance and Succession Planning Bond are now closed to new business. Read more about Friends Provident International and any changes following Aviva’s acquisition of Friends Life Group in April 2015Read moreProviding support for our existing customersUseful formsAll our  forms and documents relating to servicing your existing policies can be found under our useful forms page.Find out moreUseful formsLog in to our extranetYou can view your policy information online through our secure extranet.Find out more Log in to our extranetFriends Provident International | Rest of the world CustomerRest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Go to Adviser site  Online Services  Login/RegisterOverseas life assurance businessChange payment detailsRest of the World region - Customer siteAre you a financial adviser?Open Adviser siteChoose your regionRest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Open navigationEnter title :  On 19th July 2017 Aviva plc announced the sale of Friends Provident International Limited (“FPIL”) to RL360 Holding Company Limited (RL360), a subsidiary of International Financial Group Limited (IFGL). You can read details of the announcement here. Customers’ policies with FPIL are unaffected by this transaction; terms and conditions remain the same and customers and brokers should continue to contact FPIL as usual. FPIL remains focused on providing outstanding service to our customers. Rest of the world Customer home pageGo to Adviser siteDocument LibraryYou can visit the document library to access all relevant support literatureRead moreDocument LibraryPremier AdvanceRegular premium savings plan, providing portability and tax efficiency, plus access to some of the world’s leading fund managers.Find out morePremier AdvanceManage your portfolio onlinePick your investments in 5 simple steps.New fund switch and premium redirection feature now available onlineExplore Manage your portfolio onlineFind out moreProducts View our products, which are designed to meet your needs. Read more about ProductsMedia and CSR All our latest news releases and press contacts. Read more about Media and CSRFund centreVisit our fund centre for the latest fund news, prices, performance data and factsheets.Read more about Fund centreLearn how your money is managed.Find out more >Visit our online portal todayFind out more >Kontakta oss | Friends Provident International Rest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Go to Adviser site  Online Services  Login/RegisterOverseas life assurance businessChange payment detailsRest of the World region - Customer siteAre you a financial adviser?Open Adviser siteChoose your regionRest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Open navigationHome>Contact usContact usKontakta ossHafðu sambandInternational Protector Africa contact usInternational Term Assurance contact usKontakta oss Standard articleStandard accordion Våra spar-och investeringsprodukter som tidigare fanns tillgängliga i Sverige är nu stängda för nya investeringar. Om du har några frågor om er policy eller vill göra en förändring vänligen kontakta oss på:E-post: swedish.sales@friendsprovident.co.ukTelefon: +44 (0) 1722 415 580 Fax: +44 (0) 1722 332 005 Adress:PO Box 1550SalisburyWiltshireSP1 2TWEngland OLAB inkluderar Friends Provident Internationals investeringar och livförsäkringar som sålts till kunder utomlands, vilket inkluderar kunder i Island, Sverige och Guernsey.Försäkringsinformation Du kan logga in för att få tillgång till din försäkringsinformation för följande produkter: Directions, Flexible Range, Homebuyer Range, Level Term Assurance, Versatile Range, Capital Investment Bonds, Critical Illness.Logga InOm du har problem med att logga in på vår online-tjänst, vänligen kontakta oss via email: onlineaccess@friendslife.co.uk eller ring oss på vårt telefonnummer för allmänna frågor nedan.Begära ett värdebesked Från den 1:e april 2016 så kommer försäkringsinformation inte vara tillgänglig för följande produkter:Guernsey International Products, International Investment Account, International Investment Bond,  International Investment Plan, International Savings Plan, International with Profit Bond, Options Range, AlphaSave, International Protector Africa, Income Protection, International Team Assurance, UltimaBond / Save.Du kan begära att få ett värdebesked utskickat för dessa produkter och vi kommer skicka detta till dig i ett email. Detta kommer vara ett dagsaktuellt värde. För ytterligare information vänligen kontakta oss via de medel som listas ovan under rubriken "Kontakta oss".Begära ett värdebesked Begära ett värdebesked* All fields marked with an asterisk must be completed. Vänligen fyll i nedanstående fält och tryck på Skicka för att begära ett värdebesked. Försäkringstagarens namn *Försäkringstagarens födelsedatum *Din emailadress *Försäkringsnummer * Your policy statement has been requested and will be emailed to you soon.Request another policy statement Unfortunately, the there has been a technical issue with the submission of your detailsRequest another policy statementFonder  Fullständiga uppgifter om fonder, inklusive senaste prestandadata, priser och riskklassificering, samt olika verktyg som hjälper dig att fokusera din undersökning och analys, kan hittas här. Vi rekommenderar dock att du pratar med din finansiella rådgivare innan något investeringsbeslut. Observera att all fondinformation är på engelska. PrintEmail Fund centre | Friends Provident International Rest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Go to Adviser site  Online Services  Login/RegisterOverseas life assurance businessChange payment detailsRest of the World region - Customer siteAre you a financial adviser?Open Adviser siteChoose your regionRest of World / IoM Rest of World / IoM Hong Kong Singapore United Arab Emirates Germany Latin America United Kingdom Open navigationFund centreFund informationSearch and filter the funds available for investment.View fundsLatest fund newsFind out about recent changes to our funds.Fund updatesThe importance of diversificationFind out more >Pick your investments online in 5 simple stepsFind out more >Find out more Media and CSR All our latest news releases and press contacts. Read more about Media and CSR Document Library You can visit the document library to access all relevant support literature Read more about Document Library Investment glossaryUnderstand investment jargon with our glossary of terms.Read more about Investment glossaryCompany news releasesFind out more >Investment fundsFind out more >Our expertiseFind out more >


FRIENDS INVESTMENT COMPANY INC. Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      FRIENDS INVESTMENT COMPANY INC.
                    

•   151 24 MAROUSSI, J3
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Friends Investment Company is based out of 151 24 Maroussi.    WhaleWisdom has at least 18 13D/G filings in our database for Friends Investment Company.
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from FRIENDS INVESTMENT COMPANY INC., enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




friends investment company inc.


AETHRION CENTER

151 24 MAROUSSI
J3
                                                        
                                                    00000


              Business Phone:
              011-30-211-180-4000







Recent SEC Filings




SC 13D/A filed on 05/26/2017
SC 13D/A filed on 01/10/2017
SC 13D/A filed on 11/29/2016
SC 13D/A filed on 09/28/2015
SC 13D/A filed on 08/18/2014
SC 13D/A filed on 04/09/2014
SC 13D/A filed on 02/06/2014
SC 13D/A filed on 09/24/2013
SC 13D/A filed on 04/29/2013
SC 13D/A filed on 06/28/2012











Current 13D/G Holdings


Stock
Sector
Shares Held
Market Value
Rank
Source
Source Date





Euroseas Ltd (ESEA)


      TRANSPORTS
    

      3,452,358
    

      4,626,159.72
    

      1
    

      13D
    

      2017-05-16
    











Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free



















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































﻿







Euroseas Ltd Bearish Signal Friends Investment Co Inc decreased Stake – Octafinance



















































 








Friday, 28 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated










Euroseas Ltd Bearish Signal Friends Investment Co Inc decreased Stake


09/28/2015  by OctaStaff 
			in SEC 13G & 13D Filings 












Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called Euroseas Ltd Bearish Signal Friends Investment Co Inc decreased Stake and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/euroseas-ltd-bearish-signal-friends-investment-co-inc-decreased-stake/209253/.CaptchaSubmitFriends Investment Co Inc reduced Position in Euroseas Ltd. (NASDAQ:ESEA)
Friends Investment Co Inc has filled a SC 13D/A form regarding Euroseas Ltd . Filing Link: 000091957415007070.  Per Friends Investment Co Inc’s filing, the filler reported decreased stake in the company by -463.94% to 2,868,286 shares. Friends Investment Co Inc now owns 35.3% of the company. This form was required due to trading activity on September 18, 2015.
Why Friends Investment Co Inc Holds Euroseas Ltd. (NASDAQ:ESEA)

Item 4. Purpose of Transaction

The Reporting Persons have acquired their Common Shares of the Issuer for investment. The Reporting Persons evaluate their investment in the Common Shares on a continual basis.

Aristides J. Pittas, who serves as the Vice President and as a Director of Friends Investment Company, and who also serves as the President as a Director of Preferred Friends Investment Company, is the Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer and a Class A Director of the Issuer. Aristides P. Pittas, who serves as the President and as a Director of Friends Investment Company, and as the Secretary as a Director of Family United Navigation, is the Vice Chairman and a Class A Director of the Issuer. George Skarvelis, who serves as a Director of Friends Investment Company, is a Class B Director of the Issuer.

On August 31, 2015, the Issuer announced that it was holding a rights offering (the “Rights Offering”) in which shareholders of record as of August 14, 2015 were eligible to participate. Pursuant to the terms of the Rights Offering, the Issuer distributed to eligible shareholders, at no extra charge, three non-transferable subscription rights for each four Common Shares owned by them on such date. Each subscription right represented the right to purchase the Issuer’s Common Shares at a subscription price of $4.50 per share and consisted of a basic subscription privilege and an oversubscription privilege. The basic subscription privilege entitled holders of subscription rights to purchase one Common Share at the subscription price for each subscription right held. The oversubscription privilege entitled holders of subscription rights who exercised their basic subscription privilege in full to purchase, at the subscription price, any Common Shares that the Issuer’s other subscription rights holders did not purchase under their basic subscription privileges, subject to certain limitations. Eligible shareholders were able to exercise their subscription rights until such rights expired at 5:00 p.m., Eastern Daylight Time, on September 17, 2015. Friends Investment Company participated in the Rights Offering, resulting in its acquisition of 1,243,751 additional Common Shares.

Moreover, since certain persons serving as directors and officers for Preferred Friends Investment Company and Family United Navigation also serve in similar capacities for Friends Investment Company, Preferred Friends Investment Company, Family United Navigation and Friends Investment Company may be deemed to be affiliates of each other for purposes of reporting on Schedule 13D. As such, each Reporting Person may be deemed to beneficially own the Common Shares of the other Reporting Person.

Except as set forth above, the Reporting Persons do not have any present plan or proposal which would relate to or result in any of the matters set forth in subparagraphs (a) – (j) of Item 4 of Schedule 13D. The Reporting Persons intend to review their investment in the Issuer on a continuing basis. Depending on various factors, the Reporting Persons may in the future take such actions with respect to their investment in the Issuer as they deem appropriate including, without limitation, purchasing additional Common Shares, selling some or all of their Common Shares, engaging in short selling of or any hedging or similar transaction with respect to the Common Shares or changing its intention with respect to any and all matters referred to in Item 4.



Form 13D is SEC filing that must be submitted within 10 days, by anyone who acquires beneficial ownership of more than 5% of any publicly traded securities. A filer must promptly update its 13D filing in case of acquisition or disposition of 1% or more of the securities that are the subject of the filing. These filings may be a precursor to hostile takeovers, company breakups, and other “change of control” events.

Euroseas Ltd - Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 
Tagged: NASDAQ:ESEA



Heighten Software  $7.36 million  Fundraising. Luke Braud  Released Sep 22  Form D Krp Bakken I  $12.81 million  Financing. R Davis Ravnaas  Filed Sep 28  Form D 



 





Euroseas Ltd - Get News & Ratings Daily
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Euroseas Ltd with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 



Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


Macro NewsChina Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking CrisisAre US – Russian Relations A Zero-Sum Game?US and Russia have launched direct talks on the conflict in SyriaYuan Drops as PBOC Cuts Reference Rate by Most Since DevaluationCould the market crash like 1987?—put volume spike argues low is nearCTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?











































Business Financing, Loans & Capital | Nolo.com
















Grow Your Legal Practice
Meet the Editors
Sign In
Support








Search



Search Type

All
Products
Lawyers
Articles





Search Term



Location










Home
Legal Topics
Small Business 
Business Financing, Loans & Capital








Business Financing, Loans & Capital










 





                                            Learn about your different financing options, including how to get a lender's approval and how to raise private equity. Also, find out how business loans work and what type of financing arrangement makes the most sense for you and your business.
                                        
                







Articles on Business Financing, Loans & Capital





Business Financing FAQ
Here are questions you need to know the answer to as you finance your business.




The Lowdown on Business Loans
If you're seeking a loan for your business, make sure you understand the basics.






Raising Private Money: Gifts, Loans, and Equity Investments
Learn about your options -- gifts, loans, and equityinvestments -- when raising money from family and friends to fundyour business. 






Small Business Loans: Getting the Lender's Approval
When trying to get a business loan, it helps to view things from the lender's perspective.






Understanding Promissory Notes for Small Businesses
Learn about the different ways a promissory note can structure repayment of a business loan.






Raising Money Through Equity Investments
Learn about the pros and cons of bringing investors into yourbusiness.






Loans and Equity Investments Compared
How to choose between getting a loan or selling part of your business to an equity investor.






Private Loans & Investments: Raising Money from Family and Friends
Learn the basics of raising small business capital from family andfriends.






What is a Convertible Note?
What are the implications of having your company borrow money under a convertible note instead of a regular promissory note?









Questions on Business Financing, Loans & Capital





Can I add my good payment history on a private loan to my credit report?
If you can't get the credit bureaus to include this information in your credit report, remember, you can still include the information on an application when applying for new credit.



















        Related Products
      
MORE





Form Your Own Limited Liability Company



LLC or Corporation?



Nolo's Guide to Single-Member LLCs



Nolo's Quick LLC











            More Legal Topics
        



Business Cash Flow Problems & Bankruptcy


Business Litigation


Business Plans


eCommerce 


Going Out of Business


Running Your Small Business


Sales & Marketing


Self-Employed Consultants & Contractors






More Legal Topics




Business Cash Flow Problems & Bankruptcy


Business Litigation


Business Plans


eCommerce 


Going Out of Business


Running Your Small Business


Sales & Marketing


Self-Employed Consultants & Contractors












            Related Ads
        























NEED PROFESSIONAL HELP ?
Talk to a Business Law attorney.



Zip Code







Start



How It Works

Briefly tell us about your case
Provide your contact information
Choose attorneys to contact you












Copyright © 2017 Nolo ®  Self-help services may not be permitted in all states. The information provided on this site is not legal advice, does not constitute a lawyer referral service, and no attorney-client or confidential relationship is or will be formed by use of the site. The attorney listings on this site are paid attorney advertising. In some states, the information on this website may be considered a lawyer referral service. Please reference the Terms of Use and the Supplemental Terms for specific information related to your state. Your use of this website constitutes acceptance of the Terms of Use, Supplemental Terms, Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.


 


























